Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-650
Act, how cited.

Sections 46-638 to 46-650 shall be known and cited as the Municipal and Rural Domestic Ground Water Transfers Permit Act.

Laws 1963, c. 276, § 14, p. 832;

Laws 1980, LB 643, § 5.

A rural water district is not a municipal corporation within the purview of the City, Village and Municipal Corporation Ground Water Permit Act (now the Municipal and Rural Domestic Ground Water Transfers Permit Act). McDowell v. Rural Water District No. 2, 204 Neb. 401, 282 N.W.2d 594 (1979).